Hawaii statutes.
§447-1 Who may become dental hygienists;
fees. (a) Any person:

(1) Eighteen years of age or over;

(2) Who has a diploma or proper certificate of
graduation from a dental hygiene school accredited by the American Dental
Association Commission on Dental Accreditation that requires at least a two
year course and is recognized by the board of dental examiners;

(3) Who has been officially certified in the
administration of intra-oral infiltration local anesthesia and intra-oral block
anesthesia by an accredited dental hygiene school or by a certification program
previously approved by the board; and

(4) Who has passed the National Board Dental Hygiene
Examination;

upon written application made to and filed with the
board may be examined for qualification as a dental hygienist.

An application shall be accompanied by the
applicant's certificate of graduation from an accredited dental hygiene school,
documentary proof of the applicant's certification in the administration of
intra-oral infiltration local anesthesia and intra-oral block anesthesia, and
documentary proof of the applicant's passage of the National Board Dental
Hygiene Examination. At the time of filing the application, the applicant
shall pay to the board an application fee, which together with all other fees
or charges in this chapter, shall be as provided in rules adopted by the
director of commerce and consumer affairs pursuant to chapter 91, and shall be
deposited to the credit of the compliance resolution fund established pursuant
to section 26-9(o).

(b) The board shall require an applicant to
take and pass the State's examination or one of the following four regional
clinical examinations given after February 1, 2005, by the:

(1) Western Regional Examining Board;

(2) Central Regional Dental Testing Service, Inc.;

(3) Southern Regional Testing Agency, Inc.; or

(4) North East Regional Board of Dental Examiners,
Inc.

(c) In addition to the requirements of
subsection (a), an applicant shall take and pass a national clinical examination
once a national clinical examination becomes available and neither the state
examination nor any regional examination shall be accepted; provided that an
applicant who has taken and passed the state or a regional examination after
February 1, 2005, but prior to the availability of a national examination shall
be deemed to have met the board's examination requirement.

(d) If an applicant successfully passes the
examination required by subsections (b) and (c), the applicant shall be
licensed to practice as a dental hygienist in the State. Every licensed dental
hygienist, before entering practice, shall pay the board a license fee. On or
before December 31 of each odd-numbered year, every licensed dental hygienist
beginning or continuing to practice in the State shall pay to the board a fee
for biennial licensure. The failure, neglect, or refusal of any duly licensed
dental hygienist to pay the biennial licensure fee shall constitute a
forfeiture of the license; provided that the license may be restored upon
written application and payment to the board of a restoration fee.

(e) An applicant's or licensed dental
hygienist's competence to administer intra-oral infiltration local anesthesia
shall be demonstrated by certification in the administration of intra-oral
infiltration local anesthesia by an accredited dental hygiene school or by a
certification program previously approved by the board. An applicant's or
licensed dental hygienist's competence to administer intra-oral block
anesthesia shall be demonstrated by proof of successful completion of a course
of study in accordance with standards provided for in this chapter and the
issuance of a certificate or other program documentation listing the intra-oral
block anesthesia categories in which the applicant or licensed dental hygienist
has acquired knowledge and proficiency.

The applicant or licensed dental hygienist
shall submit documentation of course content when submitting certification in
the administration of intra-oral infiltration local anesthesia and intra-oral
block anesthesia as required by subsection (a). The board shall certify that
the applicant or licensed dental hygienist has met the requirements of this
chapter.

(f) No person shall practice dental hygiene,
either gratuitously or for pay, or shall offer or attempt so to practice, or
shall advertise or announce publicly or privately as being prepared or
qualified so to practice without having a license as provided in this section.
The original or a copy of the certificate of licensure shall be prominently
displayed at all times in the workplace where the dental hygienist is employed
or practices. A dental hygienist's pocket identification card shall be readily
available for viewing upon request to ensure the license is current. A
licensed dental hygienist shall practice only under the supervision of a
licensed dentist as provided in this chapter; provided that a licensed dental
hygienist shall administer under the direct supervision of a licensed dentist
only those categories of intra-oral block anesthesia listed in the course
content submitted to the board pursuant to subsection (a). [L 1920, c 7, §1; am
L 1923, c 136, §1; RL 1925, §1083; am L 1927, c 149, §1; am L 1931, c 158, §1;
RL 1935, §1000; am L 1941, c 6, §1; RL 1945, §2181; am L 1949, c 59, §1; RL
1955, §62-1; am L 1959, c 90, §1; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §§14, 15; am L 1961, c
142, §4 and c 184, §28; am L 1963, c 114, §§1, 3; HRS §447-1; am L 1975, c 118,
§10; am L 1982, c 204, §8 and c 240, §1; am L 1983, c 124, §17; am L 1984, c 7,
§24; am L 1987, c 73, §1; am L 1989, c 232, §1; am L 1991, c 51, §1; am L 1994,
c 183, §2; am L 1997, c 9, §§1, 2, c 39, §1, and c 232, §6; am L 1999, c 97,
§3; am L 2004, c 69, §1; am L 2005, c 122, §1; am L 2011, c 44, §1; am L 2012,
c 81, §1]

Cross References

Board of dental examiners, see §448-5.

Disposal of examination records, see §94-5.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next